District of Columbia statutes.
26-1311

Oath as fiduciary.

Whenever any corporation operating under this Code shall be appointed such trustee, personal representative, special administrator, receiver, assignee, guardian, or committee, as aforesaid, the president, vice-president, secretary, or treasurer of said company shall take the oath or affirmation required by law to be made by any trustee, personal representative, special administrator, receiver, assignee, guardian, or committee.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1305, ch. 854, § 723
June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72,§ 207(c), 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 26-411.
1973 Ed., § 26-311.
“Code” means An Act To establish a code of law for the District of Columbia, ch. 854, §§ 1 through 1642.